Nebraska, session 109, LB1020.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1020 LB1020
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 28-101, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
28-101 Sections 28-101 to 28-1357, 28-1601 to 28-1603, and 28-1701
and sections 2 to 5, 11, and 12 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Nebraska Criminal Code.
Sec. 2. For purposes of sections 2 to 5 of this act:
(1) Business entity means any form of corporation, company,
partnership, association, cooperative, joint venture, business trust, or
sole proprietorship that conducts business in this state;
(2) Mobile tracking device has the same meaning as in section
86-2,103;
(3) Private investigator means a person licensed under sections
71-3201 to 71-3213;
(4) Protection order means any protection order issued or recognized
under the Protection Orders Act;
(5) Senior adult has the same meaning as in section 28-366.01; and
(6) Vulnerable adult has the same meaning as in section 28-371.
Sec. 3. (1) Except as otherwise provided in section 4 of this act,
a person shall not knowingly:
(a) Install a mobile tracking device on another person's property
without the other person's consent;
(b) Cause a mobile tracking device to track the position or movement
of another person or another person's property without the other person's
consent; or
(c) Fail to remove or ensure the removal of a mobile tracking device
that has been installed on another person's property with such person's
consent when such consent has been revoked.
(2) For purposes of this section, if a person has given consent for
another person to install a mobile tracking device on the consenting
person's property, such consent shall be deemed to have been revoked if
any of the following applies:
-2-

LB1020 LB1020
2026 2026
(a) The consenting person communicates to the person to whom consent
was given that such consent is revoked;
(b) The consenting person and the person to whom consent was given
are married and one of them files an action for divorce, annulment, or
separate maintenance; or
(c) The consenting person receives a protection order against the
person to whom consent was given. Revocation under this subdivision (2)
(c) is effective when the person to whom consent was given has notice of
such protection order.
Sec. 4. Section 3 of this act does not apply to any of the
following:
(1) A mobile tracking device installed and used in compliance with
sections 86-271 to 86-2,115;
(2) A mobile tracking device installed and used pursuant to a court
order, including, but not limited to, as a condition of pretrial release,
probation, parole, or post-release supervision;
(3) A parent or legal guardian of a minor child who installs or uses
a mobile tracking device to track the minor child if any of the following
applies:
(a) The parents or legal guardians of the child are lawfully married
to each other and are not separated or otherwise living apart, and either
of those parents or legal guardians consents to the installation of the
tracking device or tracking application;
(b) The parent or legal guardian of the child is the sole surviving
parent or legal guardian of the child;
(c) The parent or legal guardian of the child has sole custody of
the child; or
(d) The parents or legal guardians of the child are divorced,
separated, or otherwise living apart and neither parent has sole custody
of the child, and both consent to the installation of the mobile tracking
device;
-3-

LB1020 LB1020
2026 2026
(4) A caregiver of a vulnerable adult or senior adult, if such
adult's treating physician certifies that the installation or use of a
mobile tracking device on such adult's property is necessary to ensure
the safety of such adult;
(5) A person acting in good faith on behalf of a business entity for
a legitimate business purpose or a governmental entity for a legitimate
government purpose. This subdivision (5) does not apply to a private
investigator;
(6)(a) A private investigator who is acting in the normal course of
the business of private investigation on behalf of another person and who
has the consent of the owner of the property upon which the mobile
tracking device is installed, for the purpose of obtaining information
with reference to any of the following:
(i) Criminal offenses committed, threatened, or suspected against
the United States, a territory of the United States, a state, or any
person or legal entity;
(ii) Locating an individual known to be a fugitive from justice;
(iii) Locating lost or stolen property or other assets that have
been awarded by the court; or
(iv) Investigating claims related to workers' compensation.
(b) This subdivision (6) does not apply if the person on whose
behalf the private investigator is working is the subject of a protection
order or if the private investigator knows or reasonably should know that
the person on whose behalf the private investigator is working seeks the
investigator's services to aid in the commission of a crime;
(7) An owner or lessee of a motor vehicle who installs, or directs
the installation of, a mobile tracking device on the motor vehicle during
the period of ownership or lease, if any of the following applies:
(a) The mobile tracking device is removed before the motor vehicle's
title is transferred or the motor vehicle's lease expires;
(b) The new owner of the motor vehicle, in the case of a sale, or
-4-

LB1020 LB1020
2026 2026
the lessor of the motor vehicle, in the case of an expired lease,
consents in writing to the nonremoval of the mobile tracking device; or
(c) The owner of the motor vehicle at the time of the installation
of the mobile tracking device was the original manufacturer of the motor
vehicle; or
(8) A person or business entity that installs a mobile tracking
device on any fixed-wing aircraft or rotorcraft operated or managed by
the person or business entity pursuant to 14 C.F.R. part 91 or part 135
to track the position or movement of the fixed-wing aircraft or
rotorcraft.
Sec. 5. A violation of section 3 of this act is a Class IIIA
felony.
Sec. 6. Section 28-311.02, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
28-311.02 (1) It is the intent of the Legislature to enact laws
dealing with stalking offenses which will protect victims from being
willfully harassed, intentionally terrified, threatened, or intimidated
by individuals who intentionally follow, detain, stalk, or harass them or
impose any restraint on their personal liberty and which will not
prohibit constitutionally protected activities.
(2) For purposes of sections 28-311.02 to 28-311.05:
(a) Harass means to engage in a knowing and willful course of
conduct directed at a specific person which seriously terrifies,
threatens, or intimidates the person and which serves no legitimate
purpose;
(a) (b) Course of conduct means a pattern of conduct composed of a
series of acts over a period of time, however short, evidencing a
continuity of purpose, including a series of acts of following,
detaining, restraining the personal liberty of, or stalking the person or
telephoning, contacting, or otherwise communicating with the person;
(b) (c) Family or household member has the same meaning as in
-5-

LB1020 LB1020
2026 2026
section 42-903; and means a spouse or former spouse of the victim,
children of the victim, a person presently residing with the victim or
who has resided with the victim in the past, a person who had a child in
common with the victim, other persons related to the victim by
consanguinity or affinity, or any person presently involved in a dating
relationship with the victim or who has been involved in a dating
relationship with the victim. For purposes of this subdivision, dating
relationship means frequent, intimate associations primarily
characterized by the expectation of affectional or sexual involvement but
does not include a casual relationship or an ordinary association between
persons in a business or social context; and
(c) Harass means to engage in a knowing and willful course of
conduct directed at a specific person which seriously terrifies,
threatens, or intimidates the person and which serves no legitimate
purpose.
(d) Substantially conforming criminal violation means a guilty plea,
a nolo contendere plea, or a conviction for a violation of any federal
law or law of another state or any county, city, or village ordinance of
this state or another state substantially similar to section 28-311.03.
Substantially conforming is a question of law to be determined by the
court.
Sec. 7. Section 28-311.04, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
28-311.04 A violation of section 28-311.03 is a Class IIIA felony.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any person
convicted of violating section 28-311.03 is guilty of a Class I
misdemeanor.
(2) Any person convicted of violating section 28-311.03 is guilty of
a Class IIIA felony if:
(a) The person has a prior conviction under such section or a
substantially conforming criminal violation within the last seven years;
-6-

LB1020 LB1020
2026 2026
(b) The victim is under sixteen years of age;
(c) The person possessed a deadly weapon at any time during the
violation;
(d) The person was also in violation of any protection order issued
under the Protection Orders Act or any valid foreign protection order
recognized pursuant to section 26-123 or 26-124 at any time during the
violation; or
(e) The person has been convicted of any felony in this state or has
been convicted of a crime in another jurisdiction which, if committed in
this state, would constitute a felony and the victim or a family or
household member of the victim was also the victim of such previous
felony.
Sec. 8. Section 28-311.08, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-311.08 (1) It shall be unlawful for any person to knowingly
intrude upon any other person without his or her consent in a place of
solitude or seclusion. Violation of this subsection is a Class I
misdemeanor. A second or subsequent violation of this subsection is a
Class IV felony.
(2) It shall be unlawful for any person to knowingly and
intentionally photograph, film, or otherwise record an image or video of
the intimate area of any other person without his or her knowledge and
consent when his or her intimate area would not be generally visible to
the public regardless of whether such other person is located in a public
or private place. Violation of this subsection is a Class IV felony.
(3) It shall be unlawful for any person to knowingly and
intentionally distribute or otherwise make public an image or video of
another person recorded in violation of subsection (2) of this section
without that person's consent. A first or second violation of this
subsection is a Class IIA felony. A third or subsequent violation of this
subsection is a Class II felony.
-7-

LB1020 LB1020
2026 2026
(4) It shall be unlawful for any person to knowingly and
intentionally distribute or otherwise make public an image or video of
another person's intimate area or of another person engaged in sexually
explicit conduct (a) if the other person had a reasonable expectation
that the image would remain private, (b) knowing the other person did not
consent to distributing or making public the image or video, and (c) if
distributing or making public the image or video serves no legitimate
purpose. Violation of this subsection is a Class I misdemeanor. A second
or subsequent violation of this subsection is a Class IV felony.
(5) It shall be unlawful for any person to threaten to distribute or
otherwise make public an image or video of another person's intimate area
or of another person engaged in sexually explicit conduct with the intent
to intimidate, threaten, or harass any person. Violation of this
subsection is a Class I misdemeanor.
(6) As part of sentencing following a conviction for a violation of
subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section, the court shall make a
finding as to the ages of the defendant and the victim at the time the
offense occurred. If the defendant is found to have been nineteen years
of age or older and the victim is found to have been less than eighteen
years of age at such time, then the defendant shall be required to
register under the Sex Offender Registration Act.
(7) No person shall be prosecuted under this section unless the
indictment for such offense is found by a grand jury or a complaint filed
before a magistrate within three years after the later of:
(a) The commission of the crime;
(b) Law enforcement's or a victim's receipt of actual or
constructive notice of either the existence of a video or other
electronic recording made in violation of this section or the
distribution of images, video, or other electronic recording made in
violation of this section; or
(c) The youngest victim of a violation of this section reaching the
-8-

LB1020 LB1020
2026 2026
age of twenty-one years.
(8) For purposes of this section:
(a) Intimate area means the naked or undergarment-clad genitalia,
pubic area, buttocks, or female breast of an individual;
(b) Intrude means either:
(i) Viewing another person in a state of undress as it is occurring,
whether directly or through electronic or other remote means, including,
but not limited to, by unmanned aircraft; or
(ii) Recording another person in a state of undress by video,
photographic, digital, or other electronic means including, but not
limited to, by unmanned aircraft; and
(c) Place of solitude or seclusion means a place where a person
would intend to be in a state of undress and have a reasonable
expectation of privacy, including, but not limited to, any facility,
public or private, used as a restroom, tanning booth, locker room, shower
room, fitting room, or dressing room; and .
(d) Unmanned aircraft means an aircraft, including an aircraft
commonly known as a drone, which is operated without the possibility of
direct human intervention from within or on the aircraft.
Sec. 9. Section 28-1205, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
28-1205 (1)(a) Any person who uses a firearm, a knife, brass or iron
knuckles, or any other deadly weapon to commit any felony which may be
prosecuted in a court of this state commits the offense of use of a
deadly weapon to commit a felony.
(b) Use of a deadly weapon, other than a firearm, to commit a felony
is a Class II felony.
(c) Use of a deadly weapon, which is a firearm, to commit a felony
is a Class IC felony.
(2)(a) Any person who possesses a firearm, a knife, brass or iron
knuckles, or a destructive device during the commission of any felony
-9-

LB1020 LB1020
2026 2026
which may be prosecuted in a court of this state commits the offense of
possession of a deadly weapon during the commission of a felony.
(b) Possession of a deadly weapon, other than a firearm, during the
commission of a felony is a Class III felony.
(c) Possession of a deadly weapon, which is a firearm, during the
commission of a felony is a Class II felony.
(3)(a) Any person who carries a firearm or a destructive device
during the commission of a dangerous misdemeanor commits the offense of
carrying a firearm or destructive device during the commission of a
dangerous misdemeanor.
(b) A violation of this subsection is a:
(i) Class I misdemeanor for a first or second offense; and
(ii) A Class IV felony for any third or subsequent offense.
(4) A violation of this section shall be treated as a separate and
distinct offense from the underlying crimes being committed, and a
sentence imposed under this section shall be consecutive to any other
sentence imposed.
(5) Possession of a deadly weapon may be proved through evidence
demonstrating either actual or constructive possession of a firearm, a
knife, brass or iron knuckles, or a destructive device during,
immediately prior to, or immediately after the commission of a felony.
(6) For purposes of this section:
(a) Dangerous misdemeanor means a misdemeanor violation of any of
the following offenses:
(i) Stalking under section 28-311.03;
(i) (ii) Knowing violation of any protection order issued under the
Protection Orders Act;
(ii) (iii) Domestic assault under section 28-323;
(iii) (iv) Assault of an unborn child in the third degree under
section 28-399;
(iv) (v) Theft by shoplifting under section 28-511.01;
-10-

LB1020 LB1020
2026 2026
(v) (vi) Unauthorized use of a propelled vehicle under section
28-516;
(vi) (vii) Criminal mischief under section 28-519 if such violation
arises from an incident involving the commission of a misdemeanor crime
of domestic violence;
(vii) (viii) Impersonating a police officer under section 28-610;
(viii) (ix) Resisting arrest under section 28-904;
(ix) (x) Operating a motor vehicle or vessel to avoid arrest under
section 28-905;
(x) (xi) Obstructing a peace officer under section 28-906; or
(xi) (xii) Any attempt under section 28-201 to commit an offense
described in subdivisions (6)(a)(i) through (x) (xi) of this section;
(b) Destructive device has the same meaning as in section 28-1213;
(c) Misdemeanor crime of domestic violence has the same meaning as
in section 28-1206; and
(d) Use of a deadly weapon includes the discharge, employment, or
visible display of any part of a firearm, a knife, brass or iron
knuckles, any other deadly weapon, or a destructive device during,
immediately prior to, or immediately after the commission of a felony or
communication to another indicating the presence of a firearm, a knife,
brass or iron knuckles, any other deadly weapon, or a destructive device
during, immediately prior to, or immediately after the commission of a
felony, regardless of whether such firearm, knife, brass or iron
knuckles, deadly weapon, or destructive device was discharged, actively
employed, or displayed.
Sec. 10. Section 28-1206, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
28-1206 (1) A person commits the offense of possession of a deadly
weapon by a prohibited person if he or she:
(a) Possesses a firearm, a knife, or brass or iron knuckles and he
or she:
-11-

LB1020 LB1020
2026 2026
(i) Has previously been convicted of a felony;
(ii) Is a fugitive from justice;
(iii) Is the subject of a current and valid protection order issued
under the Protection Orders Act or a current and valid foreign protection
order recognized under section 26-123 or 26-124 and is knowingly
violating such order; or
(iv) Is on probation pursuant to a deferred judgment for a felony
under section 29-2292 or 29-4803; or
(b) Possesses a firearm or brass or iron knuckles and he or she has
been convicted within the past seven years of a misdemeanor crime of
domestic violence.
(2) The felony conviction may have been had in any court in the
United States, the several states, territories, or possessions, or the
District of Columbia.
(3)(a) Possession of a deadly weapon which is not a firearm by a
prohibited person is a Class III felony.
(b) Possession of a deadly weapon which is a firearm by a prohibited
person is a Class ID felony for a first offense and a Class IB felony for
a second or subsequent offense.
(4) Subdivision (1)(a)(i) of this section shall not prohibit:
(a) Possession of archery equipment for lawful purposes; or
(b) If in possession of a recreational license, possession of a
knife for purposes of butchering, dressing, or otherwise processing or
harvesting game, fish, or furs.
(5)(a) For purposes of this section, misdemeanor crime of domestic
violence means a crime that:
(i) Is classified as a misdemeanor under the laws of the United
States or the District of Columbia or the laws of any state, territory,
possession, or tribe;
(ii) Has, as an element, the use or attempted use of physical force
or the threatened use of a deadly weapon; and
-12-

LB1020 LB1020
2026 2026
(iii) Is committed by another against his or her spouse, his or her
former spouse, a person with whom he or she has a child in common whether
or not they have been married or lived together at any time, or a person
with whom he or she is or was involved in a dating relationship as
defined in section 28-323.
(b) For purposes of this section, misdemeanor crime of domestic
violence also includes the following offenses, if committed by a person
against his or her spouse, his or her former spouse, a person with whom
he or she is or was involved in a dating relationship as defined in
section 28-323, or a person with whom he or she has a child in common
whether or not they have been married or lived together at any time:
(i) Assault in the third degree under section 28-310;
(ii) Stalking under subsection (1) of section 28-311.04;
(ii) (iii) False imprisonment in the second degree under section
28-315;
(iii) (iv) First offense domestic assault in the third degree under
subsection (1) of section 28-323; or
(iv) (v) Any attempt or conspiracy to commit any of such offenses.
(c) A person shall not be considered to have been convicted of a
misdemeanor crime of domestic violence unless:
(i) The person was represented by counsel in the case or knowingly
and intelligently waived the right to counsel in the case; and
(ii) In the case of a prosecution for a misdemeanor crime of
domestic violence for which a person was entitled to a jury trial in the
jurisdiction in which the case was tried, either:
(A) The case was tried to a jury; or
(B) The person knowingly and intelligently waived the right to have
the case tried to a jury.
(6) In addition, for purposes of this section:
(a) Archery equipment means:
(i) A longbow, recurve bow, compound bow, or nonelectric crossbow
-13-

LB1020 LB1020
2026 2026
that is drawn or cocked with human power and released by human power; and
(ii) Target or hunting arrows, including arrows with broad, fixed,
or removable heads or that contain multiple sharp cutting edges; and
(b) Recreational license means a state-issued license, certificate,
registration, permit, tag, sticker, or other similar document or
identifier evidencing permission to hunt, fish, or trap for furs in the
State of Nebraska.
Sec. 11. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Restricted area means an area of airspace within the state that:
(i) The Federal Aviation Administration has determined to be a
restricted area, either by way of a Notice to Airmen, Temporary Flight
Restriction, No Drone Zone, or other means; or
(ii) Is classified as a Class B, C, or D airspace by the Federal
Aviation Administration, as such classifications existed on January 1,
2026; and
(b) Unmanned aircraft means an aircraft, including an aircraft
commonly known as a drone, which is operated without the possibility of
direct human intervention from within or on the aircraft.
(2) Anyone who launches, operates, or causes to be launched or
operated, any unmanned aircraft system within the state shall present,
immediately upon request by any peace officer, a current certificate of
aircraft registration issued by the Federal Aviation Administration for
the unmanned aircraft system.
(3) No person shall launch, operate, or cause to be launched or
operated, any unmanned aircraft system in any restricted area unless such
person:
(a) Has received approval from the Federal Aviation Administration
to operate an unmanned aircraft system in the restricted area and is
complying with all terms and conditions of such approval; and
(b) Prior to such operation, the person has notified all state,
county, and municipal law enforcement agencies with jurisdiction in the
-14-

LB1020 LB1020
2026 2026
area that the person will be operating an unmanned aircraft in the
restricted area and that such person has approval from the Federal
Aviation Administration for such operation.
(4) A violation of this section is a Class III misdemeanor.
Sec. 12. (1) A person commits the offense of swatting if such
person:
(a) Knowingly makes, causes to be made, or directs a false or
misleading report of criminal activity or a need for emergency medical
services or assistance from firefighters;
(b) Such report is made to a law enforcement agency, public safety
answering point, or any other emergency response organization;
(c) The person knows or reasonably should know the report is false
or misleading; and
(d) The report results in the dispatch of law enforcement,
firefighters, or emergency response personnel.
(2) An offense under this section may be committed by any means of
communication, including, but not limited to, direct communication,
electronic communication, communication through a third party, or the use
of automated or digital systems.
(3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a violation
of this section is a Class I misdemeanor.
(b) A violation of this section is a Class II felony if the
violation proximately:
(i) Results in serious bodily injury to any person; or
(ii) Causes a law enforcement officer to deploy or threaten to
deploy deadly force.
(c) A violation of this section is a Class IB felony if the
violation proximately results in the death of any person, including any
law enforcement or emergency response personnel.
(4) Upon conviction for a violation of this section, the court
shall, in addition to any other punishment imposed, order the defendant
-15-

LB1020 LB1020
2026 2026
to make restitution, in accordance with sections 29-2280 to 29-2289, for
all reasonable costs incurred by any victim of the offense and by any
government entity as a result of the violation. Such expenses include,
but are not limited to, law enforcement, firefighting, and emergency
response personnel costs, tactical or specialized unit deployment,
medical treatment, and property damage.
(5) A violation of this section may be prosecuted in the county:
(a) In which the defendant made the false report;
(b) In which the recipient of the false report is located;
(c) Where the recipient responded to the false report; or
(d) Where the harm or risk of harm caused by the violation occurred.
(6) For purposes of this section:
(a) Law enforcement agency has the same meaning as in section
81-1401; and
(b) Public safety answering point has the same meaning as in section
86-1052.
Sec. 13. Section 29-2204.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
29-2204.02 (1) Except when a term of probation is required by law as
provided in subsection (2) of this section or except as otherwise
provided in subsection (2) (4) of this section, in imposing a sentence
upon an offender for a Class III, IIIA, or IV felony, the court shall:
(a) Impose a determinate sentence of imprisonment within the
applicable range in section 28-105; and
(b) Impose a sentence of post-release supervision, under the
jurisdiction of the Office of Probation Administration, within the
applicable range in section 28-105.
(2) If the criminal offense is a Class IV felony, the court shall
impose a sentence of probation unless:
(a) The defendant is concurrently or consecutively sentenced to
imprisonment for any felony other than another Class IV felony;
-16-

LB1020 LB1020
2026 2026
(b) The defendant has been deemed a habitual criminal pursuant to
section 29-2221; or
(c) There are substantial and compelling reasons why the defendant
cannot effectively and safely be supervised in the community, including,
but not limited to, the criteria in subsections (2) and (3) of section
29-2260. Unless other reasons are found to be present, that the offender
has not previously succeeded on probation is not, standing alone, a
substantial and compelling reason.
(3) If a sentence of probation is not imposed, the court shall state
its reasoning on the record, advise the defendant of his or her right to
appeal the sentence, and impose a sentence as provided in subsection (1)
of this section.
(2) (4) For any sentence of imprisonment for a Class III, IIIA, or
IV felony for an offense committed on or after August 30, 2015, imposed
consecutively or concurrently with (a) a sentence for a Class III, IIIA,
or IV felony for an offense committed prior to August 30, 2015, or (b) a
sentence of imprisonment for a Class I, IA, IB, IC, ID, II, or IIA
felony, the court shall impose an indeterminate sentence within the
applicable range in section 28-105 that does not include a period of
post-release supervision, in accordance with the process set forth in
section 29-2204.
(3) (5) For any sentence of imprisonment for a misdemeanor imposed
consecutively or concurrently with a sentence of imprisonment for a Class
III, IIIA, or IV felony for an offense committed on or after August 30,
2015, the court shall impose a determinate sentence within the applicable
range in section 28-106 unless the person is also committed to the
Department of Correctional Services in accordance with section 29-2204
for (a) a sentence of imprisonment for a Class III, IIIA, or IV felony
committed prior to August 30, 2015, or (b) a sentence of imprisonment for
a Class I, IA, IB, IC, ID, II, or IIA felony.
(4) (6) If the defendant was under eighteen years of age at the time
-17-

LB1020 LB1020
2026 2026
he or she committed the crime for which he or she was convicted, the
court may, in its discretion, instead of imposing the penalty provided
for the crime, make such disposition of the defendant as the court deems
proper under the Nebraska Juvenile Code.
(5)(a) (7)(a) When imposing a determinate sentence upon an offender
under this section, the court shall:
(i) Advise the offender on the record the time the offender will
serve on his or her term of imprisonment before his or her term of post-
release supervision assuming that no good time for which the offender
will be eligible is lost;
(ii) Advise the offender on the record the time the offender will
serve on his or her term of post-release supervision; and
(iii) When imposing a sentence following revocation of post-release
supervision, advise the offender on the record the time the offender will
serve on his or her term of imprisonment, including credit for time
served, assuming that no good time for which the offender will be
eligible is lost.
(b) If a period of post-release supervision is required but not
imposed by the sentencing court, the term of post-release supervision
shall be the minimum provided by law.
(c) If the court imposes more than one sentence upon an offender or
imposes a sentence upon an offender who is at that time serving another
sentence, the court shall state whether the sentences are to be
concurrent or consecutive.
(d) If the offender has been sentenced to two or more determinate
sentences and one or more terms of post-release supervision, the offender
shall serve all determinate sentences before being released on post-
release supervision.
Sec. 14. Section 29-2308, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-2308 (1) In all criminal cases that now are or may hereafter be
-18-

LB1020 LB1020
2026 2026
pending in the Court of Appeals or Supreme Court, the appellate court may
reduce the sentence rendered by the district court against the accused
when in its opinion the sentence is excessive, and it shall be the duty
of the appellate court to render such sentence against the accused as in
its opinion may be warranted by the evidence.
(2) No judgment shall be set aside, new trial granted, or judgment
rendered in any criminal case on the grounds of misdirection of the jury
or the improper admission or rejection of evidence or for error as to any
matter of pleading or procedure if the appellate court, after an
examination of the entire cause, considers that no substantial
miscarriage of justice has actually occurred.
(2) In all criminal cases based on offenses subject to determinate
sentencing under subsection (2) of section 29-2204.02, the appellate
court may determine that a sentence is excessive because the district
court did not provide substantial and compelling reasons for imposing a
sentence other than probation.
Sec. 15. Section 29-4103, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-4103 For purposes of the DNA Identification Information Act:
(1) Combined DNA Index System means the Federal Bureau of
Investigation's national DNA identification index system that allows the
storage and exchange of DNA records submitted by state and local forensic
DNA laboratories;
(2) DNA means deoxyribonucleic acid which is located in the cells
and provides an individual's personal genetic blueprint. DNA encodes
genetic information that is the basis of human heredity and forensic
identification;
(3) DNA record means the DNA identification information stored in
the State DNA Database or the Combined DNA Index System which is derived
from DNA typing test results;
(4) DNA sample means a blood, tissue, or bodily fluid sample
-19-

LB1020 LB1020
2026 2026
provided by any person covered by the DNA Identification Information Act
for analysis or storage, or both;
(5) DNA typing tests means the laboratory procedures which evaluate
the characteristics of a DNA sample which are of value in establishing
the identity of an individual;
(6) Law enforcement agency includes a police department, a town
marshal, a county sheriff, and the Nebraska State Patrol;
(7) Other specified offense means:
(a) False misdemeanor stalking pursuant to sections 28-311.02 to
28-311.05 or false imprisonment in the second degree pursuant to section
28-315; or
(b) An an attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to commit any of the
following offenses: False stalking pursuant to sections 28-311.02 to
28-311.05, false imprisonment in the first degree pursuant to section
28-314, false imprisonment in the second degree pursuant to section
28-315, knowing and intentional sexual abuse of a vulnerable adult or
senior adult pursuant to subdivision (1)(c) of section 28-386, or a
violation of the Sex Offender Registration Act pursuant to section
29-4011; and
(8) Released means any release, parole, furlough, work release,
prerelease, or release in any other manner from a prison, a jail, or any
other detention facility or institution.
Sec. 16. Section 84-941.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-941.01 Potentially disqualifying conviction includes a conviction
for:
(1) Criminal attempt as provided in section 28-201, conspiracy as
provided in section 28-202, or aiding and abetting as provided in section
28-206, to commit an offense listed in this section;
(2) Murder as provided in sections 28-303 or 28-304;
(3) Manslaughter as provided in section 28-305;
-20-

LB1020 LB1020
2026 2026
(4) Motor vehicle homicide as provided in section 28-306;
(5) Assault in the first or second degree as provided in sections
28-308 and 28-309;
(6) Terroristic threats as provided in section 28-311.01;
(7) Stalking as provided in section 28-311.03;
(8) A violation relating to mobile tracking devices under section 3
of this act;
(9) (8) Kidnapping as provided in section 28-313;
(10) (9) False imprisonment as provided in sections 28-314 and
28-315;
(11) (10) A sexual act subject to criminal penalties as provided in
sections 28-317 to 28-322.05;
(12) (11) Domestic assault as provided in section 28-323;
(13) (12) Robbery as provided in section 28-324;
(14) (13) Arson as provided in sections 28-502, 28-503, and 28-504;
(15) (14) Fraud subject to criminal penalties as provided in
sections 28-505, 28-631, 28-638, 28-639, 28-640, and 28-935;
(16) (15) Theft as provided in sections 28-511, 28-512, 28-513, and
28-515;
(17) (16) Forgery as provided in sections 28-602 and 28-603;
(18) (17) Incest as provided in section 28-703;
(19) (18) Child abuse as provided in section 28-707;
(20) (19) Human trafficking, labor trafficking, sex trafficking,
labor trafficking of a minor, or sex trafficking of a minor as provided
in section 28-831;
(21) (20) False reporting as provided in section 28-907;
(22) Swatting under section 12 of this act;
(23) (21) Perjury as provided in section 28-915;
(24) (22) Assault on an officer, an emergency responder, certain
employees, or a health care professional in the first degree as provided
in section 28-929;
-21-

LB1020 LB1020
2026 2026
(25) (23) Assault on an officer, an emergency responder, certain
employees, or a health care professional in the second degree as provided
in section 28-930;
(26) (24) Assault on an officer, an emergency responder, certain
employees, or a health care professional in the third degree as provided
in section 28-931;
(27) (25) Assault on an officer, an emergency responder, certain
employees, or a health care professional using a motor vehicle as
provided in section 28-931.01;
(28) (26) An offense that has as an element the threat to inflict
serious bodily injury as defined in section 28-109 or death on another
person, the intentional infliction of serious bodily injury as defined in
section 28-109 on another person, or intentionally causing the death of
another person;
(29) (27) An offense for which registration is required under the
Sex Offender Registration Act; or
(30) (28) Any offense under the laws of another jurisdiction that is
substantially equivalent to any of the offenses listed in this section.
Sec. 17. Section 86-2,103, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
86-2,103 (1) A district court may issue a warrant or other order for
the installation of a mobile tracking device, and such order may
authorize the use of that device within the jurisdiction of the court and
outside that jurisdiction if the device is installed in that
jurisdiction.
(2) For purposes of this section, mobile tracking device means any:
(a) Electronic an electronic or mechanical device which permits the
tracking of the movement of a person or object; or .
(b) Software program installed on a person's electronic device which
permits the tracking of the movement of a person or object.
Sec. 18. Original sections 29-2204.02, 29-2308, 29-4103, 84-941.01,
-22-

LB1020 LB1020
2026 2026
and 86-2,103, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, section 28-311.08,
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, and sections 28-101,
28-311.02, 28-311.04, 28-1205, and 28-1206, Revised Statutes Supplement,
2025, are repealed.
-23-